Utah statutes.
61-2c-207.   Reciprocal licensure.
(1)  The division may enter into a reciprocity agreement with another state
and issue a reciprocal license to a licensee of that state if the division
determines that the:
(a)  state has substantially equivalent licensing laws, including compliance
with Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5101,
et seq.;
(b)  state requires a licensing examination that is substantially equivalent
to the examination required by this chapter; and
(c)  licensee has not had:
(i)  formal charges alleging a violation of state mortgage laws filed against
the licensee; or
(ii)  disciplinary action or license restriction taken by the licensee's state
of domicile.
(2)  The division may issue a reciprocal license to a licensee of a state with
which the division does not have a reciprocity agreement if the individual:
(a)  submits to the division an affidavit that the individual has five years
of experience in the business of residential mortgage loans;
(b)  establishes that the individual's experience described in Subsection
(2)(a) was under requirements substantially equivalent to the licensing
requirements of this chapter; and
(c)  provides any other information required by the division by rule under
Subsection (3).
(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division shall define the information an individual shall provide to
the division pursuant to Subsection (2).
